Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2290.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. PFC Richard F. "Ricky" Ritter Memorial Highway.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) PFC Richard Frank Ritter was born October 7, 1944, in Williamsport.(2) PFC Ritter graduated from Warrior Run High School.(3) PFC Ritter entered the Marines and was a part of Company A, First Engineering Battalion, Third Marine Division.(4) PFC Ritter was killed in action on March 15, 1967, near Da Nang, Vietnam.(5) PFC Ritter received the Purple Heart posthumously.12345678910111213141516171819 (b) Designation.--The section of Pennsylvania Route 405 from segment 0270/offset 2380 to segment 220/offset 2306 on Pennsylvania Route 44 in Delaware Township and Watsontown Borough in Northumberland County is designated the PFC Richard F. "Ricky" Ritter Memorial Highway.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the highway to traffic in both directions on the highway.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2290PN3000 - 2 - 12345678910